Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 1 Composition of Senate
The eighteenth senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the city of East Providence bounded by a line beginning at the Pawtucket — East Providence boundary line and Newport Ave; thence easterly on the Pawtucket — East Providence boundary line to the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence southerly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to Mink St; thence southerly on Mink St to Wampanoag Trl; thence southerly on Wampanoag Trl to Socony Rd; thence westerly on Socony Rd to census block 440070105024012; thence southwesterly on the eastern boundary line of census block 440070105024012 to census block 440070105024016; thence southerly on the western boundary lines of census block 440070105024016 to Willett Ave; thence southeasterly on Willett Ave to Crescent View Ave; thence westerly on Crescent View Ave to Beach Rd; thence westerly on Beach Rd and its extension to Narragansett Bay and the Cranston — East Providence boundary line; thence northerly on the Cranston — East Providence boundary line to the Providence — East Providence boundary line; thence northerly on the Providence — East Providence boundary line to the line extending from Waterview Ave; thence easterly on the line extending from Waterview Ave to Sunnyside Ave; thence northerly on Sunnyside Ave to Boyden Blvd; thence easterly on Boyden Blvd; thence southerly on Pawtucket Ave to Village Green N; thence easterly on Village Green N to census block 440070105024003; thence northerly and easterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070105024003 — 440070105024001 to census block 440070105023019; thence northerly and easterly on the western and northern boundary line of census block 440070105023019 to East Shore Expy; thence northerly on East Shore Expy N to I-195; thence westerly on I-195 to Pawtucket Ave; thence northerly on Pawtucket Ave to Centre St; thence northwesterly on Centre St to N Broadway; thence northerly on N Broadway to Geenwood Ave; thence northwesterly on Greenwood Ave to railroad tracks; thence northeasterly on railroad tracks to Pawtucket Ave; thence northwesterly on Pawtucket Ave to Newport Ave; thence northerly on Newport Ave to the point of origin.

The eighteenth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the city of Pawtucket bounded by a line beginning at the Pawtucket — East Providence boundary line and Ten Mile River; thence northerly on Ten Mile River to the utility right of way; thence westerly on the utility right of way to Newport Ave; thence northerly on Newport Ave to Loring Pkwy; thence easterly on Loring Pkwy to the western boundary line of Slater Memorial Park; thence northerly on the western boundary line of Slater Memorial Park to Slater Park Ave; thence northerly on Slater Park Ave to Waterman St; thence westerly on Waterman St to Newport Ave; thence northerly on Newport Ave to Armistice Blvd; thence westerly on Armistice Blvd to George Bennett Hwy; thence northerly on George Bennett Hwy to Central Ave; thence westerly on Central Ave to N Bend St; thence southerly on N Bend St to Walcott St; thence westerly on Walcott St to I-95; thence southwesterly on I-95 to Prospect St; thence southeasterly on Prospect St to the utility right of way; thence northeasterly on the utility right of way to census block 440070171003029; thence southerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070171003029 — 440070171003019 to Notre Dame Ave; thence southerly on Notre Dame Ave to Beverage Hill Ave; thence westerly on Beverage Hill Ave to School St; thence southerly on School St to census block 440070171001025; thence westerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070171001025 — 440070171001007 to the Seekonk River; thence southerly on the Seekonk River to the Pawtucket — East Providence boundary line; thence easterly on the Pawtucket — East Providence boundary line to the point of origin.

Nineteenth district:
The nineteenth senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Cumberland bounded by a line beginning at the Lincoln — Cumberland boundary line and School St; thence easterly on School St to Albion Rd; thence southeasterly on Albion Rd to census block 440070114033042; thence easterly, northerly and westerly on the eastern boundary of census block 440070114033014 to Farm Dr; thence easterly on Farm Dr to Mendon Rd; thence northerly on Mendon Rd to Pound Rd; thence northeasterly on Pound Rd to census block 440070114022058; thence northwesterly on the western boundary lines of census blocks 440070114022058 and 440070114022052 to Nate Whipple Highway; thence easterly on Nate Whipple Hwy to Diamond Hill Rd; thence northerly on Diamond Hill Rd to Wrentham Rd; thence northerly on Wrentham Rd to the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence easterly and southerly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the Cumberland — Central Falls boundary line; thence westerly on the Cumberland — Central Falls boundary line to the Lincoln — Cumberland boundary line; thence northwesterly on the Lincoln — Cumberland boundary line to the point of origin.

The nineteenth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Lincoln bounded by a line beginning at the Cumberland — Lincoln boundary line and Lonsdale Ave; thence southerly on Lonsdale Ave to Cook St; thence westerly on Cook St to Carrington St; thence southwesterly on Carrington St to Front St; thence southwesterly on Front St to Grove St; thence northwesterly on Grove St to Union St; thence southwesterly on Union St to Pleasant St; thence northerly on Pleasant St to Leicester Dr; thence southwesterly on Leicester Dr to census block 440070117011037; thence southwesterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070117011037 — 440070117011035 to Sweeney St; thence southwesterly on Sweeney St to River Rd; thence southwesterly on River Rd to Great Rd; thence southerly on Great Rd to Smithfield Ave; thence southerly on Smithfield Ave to Sayesville Pond; thence southeasterly on the eastern shoreline of Sayesville Pond to Walker St; thence easterly on Walker St to Moshassuck Rd; thence southeasterly on Moshassuck Rd to Conduit St; thence northeasterly on the line extending from Conduit St to the Central Falls — Lincoln boundary line; thence easterly on the Central Falls — Lincoln boundary line to the Cumberland — Lincoln boundary line; thence northerly on the Cumberland — Lincoln boundary line to the point of origin.

Twentieth district:
The twentieth senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Woonsocket bounded by a line beginning at Rathbun St and the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence easterly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the Woonsocket — Cumberland boundary line; thence southwesterly on the Woonsocket — Cumberland boundary line to the Woonsocket — North Smithfield boundary line; thence westerly on the Woonsocket — North Smithfield boundary line to census block 440070177002018; thence northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070177002017 — 440070177002018 to Carnation St; thence easterly on Carnation St to Knight St; thence northerly on Knight St to Cooper Ave; thence easterly on Cooper Ave to Jillson Ave; thence northerly on Jillson Ave to Getchell Ave; thence westerly on Getchell Ave to census block 440070177002000; thence northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070177002000 — 440070177002005 to Logee St; thence easterly on Logee St to Mt St Charles Ave; thence northeasterly on Mt St Charles Ave to Manville Rd; thence northwesterly on Manville Rd to Davison Ave; thence northerly on Davison Ave to Hamlet Ave; thence easterly on Hamlet Ave to Cumberland St; thence northwesterly on Cumberland St to Rathbun St; thence northerly on Rathbun St to the point of origin.

The twentieth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Cumberland bounded by a line beginning at the Lincoln — Cumberland boundary line and School St; thence easterly on School St to Albion Rd; thence southeasterly on Albion Rd to census block 440070114033042; thence easterly, northerly and westerly on the eastern boundary line of census block 440070114033014 to Farm Dr; thence easterly on Farm Dr to Mendon Rd; thence northerly on Mendon Rd to Pound Rd; thence northeasterly on Pound Rd to census block 440070114022058; thence northwesterly on the western boundary lines of census blocks 440070114022058 and 440070114022052 to Nate Whipple Highway; thence easterly on Nate Whipple Hwy to Diamond Hill Rd; thence northerly on Diamond Hill Rd to Wrentham Rd; thence northerly on Wrentham Rd to the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence westerly on the Massachusetts — Rhode Island boundary line to the Woonsocket — Cumberland boundary line; thence southwesterly on the Woonsocket — Cumberland boundary line to the Lincoln — Cumberland boundary line; thence southeasterly on the Lincoln — Cumberland boundary line to the point of origin.

Twenty-first district: The twenty-first senatorial district shall consist of all of the town of Foster.

The twenty-first senatorial district shall also consist of all of the town of Scituate.

The twenty-first senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of West Greenwich bounded by a line beginning at the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line and Bailey Pond Rd; thence easterly on Bailey Pond Rd to Hazard Rd; thence northerly on Hazard Rd to Muddy Brook Rd; thence easterly on Muddy Brook Rd to Hudson Pond Rd; thence southeasterly on Hudson Pond Rd to Liberty Hill Rd; thence northeasterly on Liberty Hill Rd to Plain Meeting House Rd; thence easterly on Plain Meeting House Rd to Factory Brook; thence southeasterly on Factory Brook to Eisenhower Lake; thence southerly on Eisenhower Lake’s eastern shore to Stuckey Lane; thence easterly on Stuckey Lane to Wheatley Rd; thence easterly on Wheatley Rd to Francis H. Horn Dr; thence northeasterly on Francis H. Horn Dr to Browns Corner Rd; thence northeasterly on Browns Corner Rd to Victory Hwy; thence southerly on Victory Hwy to Robin Hollow Rd: thence easterly on Robin Hollow Rd to I-95; thence northeasterly on I-95 to Big River; thence northerly on Big River to the Coventry — West Greenwich boundary line; thence westerly on the Coventry — West Greenwich boundary line to the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line; thence southerly on the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line to the point of origin.

The twenty-first senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Coventry bounded by a line beginning at the Coventry — West Greenwich boundary line and Victory Hwy; thence northerly on Victory Hwy to Harkney Hill Rd; thence easterly on Harkney Hill Rd to census block 440030207022041; thence northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440030207022040 — 440030207022041 to Washington Secondary Trail; thence easterly and northeasterly on Washington Secondary Trail to the eastern shore of Johnson’s Pond; thence southerly on the eastern shore of Johnson’s Pond to the South Branch Pawtuxet River; thence easterly on the South Branch Pawtuxet River to the Mishnock River; thence southerly on the Mishnock River to Tiogue Ave; thence easterly on Tiogue Ave to S Main Street; thence northeasterly on S Main St to Rathbun St; thence easterly on Rathbun St to Wood St; thence southeasterly on Wood St to Sandy Bottom Rd; thence northerly on Sandy Bottom Rd to Main St; thence northeasterly on Main St to Knotty Oak Rd; thence northerly on Knotty Oak Rd to the Scituate — Coventry boundary line; thence westerly on the Scituate — Coventry boundary line to the Foster — Coventry boundary line; thence westerly on the Foster — Coventry boundary line to the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line; thence southerly on the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line to the Coventry — West Greenwich boundary line; thence easterly on the Coventry — West Greenwich boundary line to the point of origin.

Twenty-second district:
The twenty-second senatorial district shall consist of all of the town of Smithfield.

The twenty-second senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of North Providence bounded by a line beginning at the Smithfield—North Providence boundary line and Smithfield Road; thence southeasterly on Smithfield Rd to census block 440070121043001; thence southerly, easterly and westerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070121043002 — 440070121043001, 440070121043002 — 440070121043000, 440070121043002 — 440070119021003, 440070121043002 — 440070121043019, 440070121043002 — 440070121043011 and 440070121043002 — 440070121043005 to Bicentennial Way; thence westerly on Bicentennial Way to Locust Ave; thence southerly on Locust Ave to Jacksonia Dr; thence westerly on Jacksonia Dr to Joslin St; thence southerly on Joslin St to census block 440070121032014; thence easterly and southerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070121032014 — 440070121032013 to census block 440070121032015; thence westerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070121032014 — 440070121032015 to the intersection of Walter Ave and Joslin St; thence southerly on Joslin St to Mineral Spring Ave; thence easterly on Mineral Spring Ave to Howard Ave; thence southerly on Howard Ave to Hobson Ave; thence southwesterly on Hobson Ave to Dewey Ave; thence southerly on Dewey Ave to Smith St; thence easterly on Smith St to Atlantic Blvd; thence southwesterly on Atlantic Blvd to Swan St; thence southeasterly on Swan St to Sykes St; thence westerly and southerly on Sykes St to Intervale Ave; thence easterly on Intervale Ave to Cranberry Rd; thence southerly on Cranberry Rd to Humbert St; thence westerly on Humbert St to Greenville Ave; thence southerly on Greenville Ave to Lyman Ave; thence westerly on Lyman Ave to Woonasquatucket Ave; thence northerly on Woonasquatucket Ave to Testa Dr; thence westerly on Testa Dr and its extension to the Johnston — North Providence boundary line; thence northwesterly on the Johnston — North Providence boundary line to the Smithfield — North Providence boundary line; thence easterly on the Smithfield — North Providence boundary line to the point of origin.

The twenty-second senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Lincoln bounded by a line beginning at the Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line and Douglas Pike; thence northerly on the Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line to Wilbur Rd; thence easterly on Wilbur Rd to Jenckes Hill Rd; thence southeasterly on Jenckes Hill Rd to Angell Rd; thence southerly on Angell Rd to census block 440070116002026; thence southerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070116002026 — 440070116002027 to the Wenscott Reservoir; thence southerly on the Wenscott Reservoir to the Lincoln — North Providence boundary line thence westerly on the Lincoln — North Providence boundary line to the point of origin.

Twenty-third district:
The twenty-third senatorial district shall consist of all of the town of Burrillville.

The twenty-third senatorial district shall also consist of all of the town of Glocester.

The twenty-third senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of North Smithfield bounded by a line beginning at the Burrillville — North Smithfield boundary line and Slatersville Reservoir; thence northeasterly on Slatersville Reservoir to Railroad St; thence northwesterly on Railroad St to Main St; thence easterly on Main St to Greene St; thence northeasterly on Greene St to School St; thence easterly on School St to the utility right of way; thence southerly on the utility right of way to Branch River; thence easterly and northerly on Branch River to the western tributary of the Blackstone River; thence northerly on the western tributary of the Blackstone River to the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence westerly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the Burrillville — North Smithfield boundary line; thence southerly on the Burrillville — North Smithfield boundary line to the point of origin.

Twenty-fourth district:
The twenty-fourth senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Woonsocket bounded by a line beginning at Rathbun St and the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence westerly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the Woonsocket — North Smithfield boundary line; thence southerly, westerly and southeasterly on the Woonsocket — North Smithfield boundary line to census block 440070177002017; thence northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070177002017 — 440070177002018 to Carnation St; thence easterly on Carnation St to Knight St; thence northerly on Knight St to Cooper Ave; thence easterly on Cooper Ave to Jillson Ave; thence northerly on Jillson Ave to Getchell Ave; thence westerly on Getchell Ave to census block 440070177002000; thence northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070177002000 — 440070177002005 to Logee St; thence easterly on Logee St to Mt St Charles Ave; thence northeasterly on Mt St Charles Ave to Manville Rd; thence northwesterly on Manville Rd to Davison Ave; thence northerly on Davison Ave to Hamlet Ave; thence easterly on Hamlet Ave to Cumberland St; thence northwesterly on Cumberland St to Rathbun St; thence northerly on Rathbun St to the point of origin.

The twenty-fourth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of North Smithfield bounded by a line beginning at the Woonsocket — North Smithfield boundary line and the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence westerly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the western tributary of the Blackstone River; thence southerly on the western tributary of the Blackstone River to the Branch River; thence southerly and westerly on the Branch River to the utility right of way; thence southeasterly on the utility right of way to Woonsocket Hill Rd; thence northeasterly on Woonsocket Hill Rd to State Route 146A; thence easterly on State Route 146A to the Woonsocket — North Smithfield boundary line; thence northerly on the Woonsocket — North Smithfield boundary line to the point of origin.

Twenty-fifth district:
The twenty-fifth senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Johnston bounded by a line beginning at the Providence — Johnston boundary line and Plainfield St; thence southerly on Plainfield St to Morgan Ave; thence westerly on Morgan Ave to School St; thence southwesterly on School St to census block 440070125001021; thence northerly on the eastern boundary lines of census blocks 440070125001021 and 440070125001014 to Downing Dr; thence northerly on Downing Dr to Central Ave; thence northeasterly on Central Ave to Alden St; thence northerly on Alden St to Boundary Ave; thence easterly on Boundary Ave to Harding Ave; thence northerly on Harding Ave to York Rd; thence easterly on York Rd to census block 440070124021024; thence northerly and easterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070124021024 — 440070124021027 and 440070124021024 — 440070124021025 to the Providence — Johnston boundary line; thence northerly and easterly on the Providence — Johnston boundary line to the Johnston — North Providence boundary line; thence northwesterly on the Johnston — North Providence boundary line to the Johnston — Smithfield boundary line; thence westerly on the Johnston — Smithfield boundary line to the Scituate — Johnston boundary line; thence southerly on the Scituate — Johnston boundary line to the Johnston — Cranston boundary line; thence easterly on the Johnston — Cranston boundary line to the Johnston — Providence boundary line; thence northerly on the Johnston — Providence boundary line to the point of origin.

Twenty-sixth district:
The twenty-sixth senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Cranston bounded by a line beginning at the Cranston — West Warwick boundary line and Natick Ave; thence northerly on Natick Ave to Phenix Ave; thence northeasterly on Phenix Ave to Park Ave; thence easterly on Park Ave to Washington Secondary Trail; thence northeasterly on Washington Secondary Trail to Cranston St; thence easterly on Cranston St to the Providence — Cranston boundary line; thence northwesterly on the Providence — Cranston boundary line to the Johnston — Cranston boundary line; thence southwesterly on the Johnston — Cranston boundary line to the Scituate — Cranston boundary line; thence southerly on the Scituate — Cranston boundary line to the Cranston — Coventry boundary line; thence easterly on the Cranston — Coventry boundary line to the Cranston — West Warwick boundary line; thence easterly on the Cranston — West Warwick boundary line to the point of origin.

Twenty-seventh district:
The twenty-seventh senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Cranston bounded by a line beginning at Natick Ave and the Cranston — West Warwick boundary line; thence northerly on Natick Ave to Phenix Ave; thence northeasterly on Phenix Ave to Park Ave; thence easterly on Park Ave to Pontiac Ave; thence southerly on Pontiac Ave to Rockland Ave; thence southeasterly on Rockland Ave to Forest Ave; thence southerly on Forest Ave to Mapleton St; thence southwesterly on Mapleton St to census block 440070138004011; thence southeasterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070138004011 — 440070138004010 and 440070138004022 — 440070138004025 to the Pawtuxet River; thence southwesterly on the Pawtuxet River to State Highway 37; thence westerly on State Highway 37 to census block 440070142002008; thence southwesterly on the eastern boundary lines of census blocks 440070142002008, 440070142002019, and 440070142002028 to Pontiac Ave; thence southerly on Pontiac Ave to the Cranston — Warwick boundary line; thence westerly on the Cranston — Warwick boundary line to the Cranston — West Warwick boundary line; thence westerly on the Cranston — West Warwick boundary line to the point of origin.

The twenty-seventh senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of West Warwick bounded by a line beginning at the Cranston — West Warwick boundary line and Natick Rd; thence southerly on Natick Rd to Wakefield St; thence southeasterly on Wakefield St to Wilson St; thence southerly on Wilson St to Prospect Hill Ave; thence easterly on Prospect Hill Ave to Providence St; thence southerly on Providence St to the West Warwick — Warwick boundary line; thence northeasterly on the West Warwick — Warwick boundary line to the Cranston — West Warwick boundary line; thence westerly on the Cranston — West Warwick boundary line to the point of origin.

Twenty-eighth district:
The twenty-eighth senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Cranston bounded by a line beginning at the Providence — Cranston boundary line and I-95; thence northwesterly on the Providence — Cranston boundary line to Cranston St; thence westerly on Cranston St to the Washington Secondary Trail; thence southwesterly on the Washington Secondary trail to Park Ave; thence easterly on Park Ave to Pontiac Ave; thence southerly on Pontiac Ave to Hodsell St; thence northeasterly on Hodsell St to Arthur St; thence easterly on Arthur St to Doric Ave; thence northerly on Doric Ave to Laurens St; thence easterly on Laurens St to I-95; thence southerly on I-95 to the Cranston — Warwick boundary line; thence easterly on the Cranston — Warwick boundary line to the East Providence — Cranston boundary line; thence northerly on the East Providence — Cranston boundary line to the Providence — Cranston boundary line; thence westerly and southerly on the Providence — Cranston boundary line to the point of origin.

The twenty-eighth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at the Providence — Cranston boundary line and I-95; thence northeasterly on I-95 to Broad St; thence southwesterly on Broad St to Washington Ave; thence easterly on Washington Ave to Michigan Ave; thence northerly on Michigan Ave to census block 440070001011006; thence easterly and northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070001011006 — 440070001011007 to census block 440070001011008; thence northerly and easterly on the western boundary line of census block 440070001011008 to Shipyard St; thence northwesterly on Shipyard St to Ernest St; thence westerly on Ernest St to Allens Ave; thence northerly on Allens Ave to census block 440070006001096 thence easterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070006001096 — 440070001011001 on a line extending to the Providence — East Providence boundary line; thence southerly on the Providence — East Providence boundary line to the Providence — Cranston boundary line; thence westerly, southerly and northerly on the Providence — Cranston boundary line to the point of origin.

Twenty-ninth district:
The twenty-ninth senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Warwick bounded by a line beginning at State Highway 37 and Post Rd; thence northeasterly on Post Rd to Atlantic Ave; thence easterly on Atlantic Ave to Warwick Ave; thence southerly on Warwick Ave to Spring Green Pond; thence easterly on the unnamed river from Spring Green Pond to Narragansett Bay and the Warwick — East Providence boundary line; thence southerly on the Warwick — East Providence boundary line to the line extending from Park Ave; thence southwesterly on Park Ave to Elmdale Ave; thence northwesterly on Elmdale Ave to Longmeadow Ave; thence northerly on Longmeadow Ave to Draper Ave; thence northwesterly on Draper Ave to West Shore Rd; thence southerly and westerly on West Shore Rd to Groveland Ave; thence northerly on Groveland Ave, continuing on the boundary line between census blocks 440030219013036 — 440030219012003 to Main Ave; thence westerly on Main Ave to the Amtrak RR; thence northerly on Amtrak RR to State Highway 37; thence southeasterly on State Highway 37 to the point of origin.

Thirtieth district:
The thirtieth senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Warwick bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of Centerville Rd and the Warwick — West Warwick boundary line; thence southerly on the Warwick — West Warwick boundary line to the Warwick — East Greenwich boundary line; thence easterly on the Warwick — East Greenwich boundary line to Greenwich Bay; thence northerly and easterly around the shoreline to the line extending from Park Ave; thence southwesterly on Park Ave to Elmdale Ave; thence northwesterly on Elmdale Ave to Longmeadow Ave; thence northerly on Longmeadow Ave to Draper Ave; thence northwesterly on Draper Ave to West Shore Rd; thence southerly and westerly on West Shore Rd to Groveland Ave; thence northerly on Groveland Ave, continuing on the boundary lines between census blocks 440030219013036 — 440030219012003 to Main Ave; thence westerly on Main Ave to the Amtrak RR; thence southerly on Amtrak RR to Post Rd; thence westerly on Post Rd to Veterans Memorial Dr; thence southwesterly on Veterans Memorial Dr to Centerville Rd; thence westerly on Centerville Rd to the point of origin.

The thirtieth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the city of Warwick known as Potowomut or Potowomut Neck.

Thirty-first district:
The thirty-first senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Warwick bounded by a line beginning at State Highway 37 and Post Rd; thence northeasterly on Post Rd to Atlantic Ave; thence easterly on Atlantic Ave to Warwick Ave; thence southerly on Warwick Ave to Spring Green Pond; thence easterly on the unnamed river from Spring Green Pond to Narragansett Bay and the Warwick — East Providence boundary line; thence northerly on the Warwick — East Providence boundary line to the Cranston — Warwick boundary line; thence easterly and southerly on the Cranston — Warwick boundary line to Warwick — West Warwick boundary line; thence southwesterly and easterly on the Warwick — West Warwick boundary line to Centerville Rd; thence easterly on Centerville Rd to Veterans Memorial Dr; thence northeasterly on Veterans Memorial Dr to Post Rd; thence easterly on Post Rd to Amtrak RR; thence northerly on Amtrak RR to State Highway 37; thence southeasterly on State Highway 37 to the point of origin.

The thirty-first senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the city of Cranston bounded by a line beginning at the Cranston — Warwick boundary line and I-95; thence northerly on I-95 to Laurens St; thence westerly on Laurens St to Doric Ave; thence southerly on Doric Ave to Arthur St; thence westerly on Arthur St to Hodsell St; thence southwesterly on Hodsell St to Pontiac Ave; thence southerly on Pontiac Ave to Rockland Ave; thence southeasterly on Rockland Ave to Forest Ave; thence southerly on Forest Ave to Mapleton St; thence southwesterly on Mapleton St to census block 440070138004011; thence southeasterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070138004011 — 440070138004010 and 440070138004022 — 440070138004025 to the Pawtuxet River; thence southwesterly on the Pawtuxet River to State Highway 37; thence westerly on State Highway 37 to census block 440070142002008; thence southwesterly on the eastern boundary lines of census blocks 440070142002008, 440070142002019, and 440070142002028 to Pontiac Ave; thence southerly on Pontiac Ave to the Cranston — Warwick boundary line; thence easterly on the Cranston — Warwick boundary line to the point of origin.

Thirty-second district:
The thirty-second senatorial district shall consist of all of the town of Barrington.

The thirty-second senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the city of East Providence bounded by a line beginning at the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line and Mink St; thence southerly on Mink St to Wampanoag Trl; thence southerly on Wampanoag Trl to Socony Rd; thence westerly on Socony Rd to census block 440070105024012; thence southwesterly on the eastern boundary line of census block 440070105024012 to census block 440070105024016; thence southerly on the western boundary line of census block 440070105024016 to Willett Ave; thence southeasterly on Willett Ave to Crescent View Ave; thence westerly on Crescent View Ave to Beach Rd; thence westerly on Beach Rd and its extension to Narragansett Bay; thence southerly and easterly on the shoreline to the East Providence — Barrington boundary line; thence northeasterly on the East Providence — Barrington boundary line to the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence northerly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the point of origin.

The thirty-second senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Bristol bounded by a line beginning at the Bristol — Warren boundary line and Hope St; thence southerly on Hope St to Tupelo St; thence easterly on Tupelo St to Metacom Ave; thence southerly on Metacom Ave to Chestnut St; thence westerly on Chestnut St to Hope St; thence southerly on Hope to State St; thence westerly on State St and its extension to Bristol Harbor; thence southerly on Bristol Harbor to the Bristol — Portsmouth boundary line; thence westerly and northerly on the Bristol — Portsmouth boundary line to the Bristol — Barrington boundary line; thence northerly on the Bristol — Barrington boundary line to the Bristol — Warren boundary line; thence easterly on the Bristol — Warren boundary line to the point of origin.

Thirty-third district:
The thirty-third senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Coventry bounded by line beginning where the Coventry — West Greenwich boundary line and Victory Hwy; thence northerly on Victory Hwy to Harkney Hill Rd; thence easterly on Harkney Hill Rd to census block 440030207022041; thence northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440030207022040 — 440030207022041 to Washington Secondary Trail; thence easterly and northeasterly on Washington Secondary Trail to the eastern shore of Johnson’s Pond; thence on the eastern shore of Johnson’s Pond to the South Branch Pawtuxet River; thence easterly on the South Branch Pawtuxet River to the Mishnock River; thence southerly on the Mishnock River to Tiogue Ave; thence easterly on Tiogue Ave to S Main Street; thence northeasterly on S Main St to Rathbun St; thence easterly on Rathbun St to Wood St; thence southeasterly on Wood St to Sandy Bottom Rd; thence northerly on Sandy Bottom Rd to Main St; thence northeasterly on Main St to Knotty Oak Rd; thence northerly on Knotty Oak Rd to the Scituate — Coventry boundary line; thence easterly on the Scituate — Coventry boundary line to the Cranston — Coventry boundary line; thence easterly on the Cranston — Coventry boundary line to the Coventry — West Warwick boundary line; thence southerly on the Coventry — West Warwick boundary line to the Coventry — East Greenwich boundary line; thence westerly on the Coventry — East Greenwich boundary line to the Coventry — West Greenwich boundary; thence westerly on the Coventry — West Greenwich boundary line to the point of origin.

The thirty-third senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of West Greenwich bounded by a line beginning at the West Greenwich — Exeter boundary line and I-95; thence northeasterly on I-95 to Big River; thence northerly on Big River to the Coventry — West Greenwich boundary line; thence easterly on the Coventry — West Greenwich boundary line to the West Greenwich — East Greenwich boundary line; thence southerly on the West Greenwich — East Greenwich boundary line to the West Greenwich — Exeter boundary line; thence westerly on the West Greenwich — Exeter boundary line to the point of origin.

Thirty-fourth district:
The thirty-fourth senatorial district shall consist of all of the town of Exeter.

The thirty-fourth senatorial district shall also consist of all of the town of Richmond.

The thirty-fourth senatorial district shall also consist of all of the town of Hopkinton.

The thirty-fourth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of West Greenwich bounded by a line beginning at the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line and Bailey Pond Rd; thence easterly on Bailey Pond Rd to Hazard Rd; thence northerly on Hazard Rd to Muddy Brook Rd; thence easterly on Muddy Brook Rd to Hudson Pond Rd; thence southeasterly on Hudson Pond Rd to Liberty Hill Rd; thence northeasterly on Liberty Hill Rd to Plain Meeting House Rd; thence easterly on Plain Meeting House Rd to Factory Brook; thence southeasterly on Factory Brook to Eisenhower Lake; thence southerly on Eisenhower Lake’s eastern shore to Stuckey Lane; thence easterly on Stuckey Lane to Wheatley Rd; thence easterly on Wheatley Rd to Francis H. Horn Dr; thence northeasterly on Francis H. Horn Dr to Browns Corner Rd; thence northeasterly on Browns Corner Rd to Victory Hwy; thence southerly on Victory Hwy to Robin Hollow Rd: thence easterly on Robin Hollow Rd to I-95; thence southwesterly on I-95 to the West Greenwich — Exeter boundary line; thence westerly on the West Greenwich — Exeter boundary line to the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line; thence northerly on the Rhode Island — Connecticut boundary line to the point of origin.

The thirty-fourth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town Charlestown bounded by a line beginning at the Hopkinton — Charlestown boundary line and Amtrak RR; thence northerly on Amtrak RR to Burdickville Rd; thence easterly on Burdickville Rd to Shumankanuc Hill Rd; thence southeasterly on Shumankanuc Hill Rd to Kings Factory Rd; thence easterly and southerly on Kings Factory Rd to Post Rd; thence easterly on Post Rd to the Charlestown — South Kingstown boundary line; thence northerly on the Charlestown — South Kingstown boundary line to the Richmond — Charlestown boundary line; thence westerly on the Richmond — Charlestown boundary line to the Hopkinton — Charlestown boundary line; thence southerly on the Hopkinton — Charlestown boundary line to the point of origin.

Thirty-fifth district: The thirty-fifth senatorial district shall consist of all of the town of East Greenwich.

The thirty-fifth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of North Kingstown bounded by a line beginning at the Warwick — North Kingstown boundary line and Potowomut Rd; thence southerly on Potowomut Rd to Essex Rd; thence easterly on Essex Rd to Potter Rd; thence southerly on Potter Rd to Sandhill Brook; thence southwesterly on Sandhill Brook to Chadsey Rd; thence northerly on Chadsey Rd to Post Rd; thence southerly on Post Rd to Cocumcussoc Brook; thence westerly on Cocumcussoc Brook to Amtrak RR; thence southerly on Amtrak RR to Colonel Rodman Highway; thence southerly on Colonel Rodman Highway to US Highway 1; thence southerly on US Highway 1 to State Route 138; thence easterly on State Route 138 to the Mattatuxet River; thence southerly on the Mattatuxet River to the Pettaquamscutt River; thence southerly on the Pettaquamscut River to the North Kingstown — South Kingstown boundary line; thence westerly on the North Kingstown — South Kingstown boundary line to the Exeter — North Kingstown boundary line; thence northerly on the Exeter — North Kingstown boundary line to the East Greenwich — North Kingstown boundary line; thence easterly and northeasterly on the East Greenwich — North Kingstown boundary line to the Warwick — North Kingstown boundary line; thence easterly on the Warwick — North Kingstown boundary line to the point of origin.

The thirty-fifth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of South Kingstown bounded by a line beginning at the North Kingstown — South Kingstown boundary line and US Highway 1; thence southerly on US Highway 1 to Old Tower Hill Rd; thence westerly on Old Tower Hill Rd to Main St; thence westerly on Main St to Woodruff Ave; thence southerly on Woodruff Ave to the William C. O’Neill Bike Path; thence northwesterly on the William C. O’Neill Bike Path to Cemetery Ln; thence westerly on Cemetery Ln to High St; thence southerly on High St to Main St; thence northerly on Main St to the Saugatuck River; thence southerly on the Saugatuck River to census block 440090512021042; thence northerly on the western boundary line of census block 440090512021042 to Kenyon Ave; thence southeasterly on Kenyon Ave to Salt Pond Rd; thence southerly on Salt Pond Rd to US Highway 1; thence easterly on US Highway 1 to the South Kingstown — Narragansett boundary line; thence northerly on the South Kingstown — Narragansett boundary line to the North Kingstown — South Kingstown boundary line; thence westerly on the North Kingstown — South Kingstown boundary line to the point of origin.

Thirty-sixth district:
The thirty-sixth senatorial district shall consist of all of the town of Narragansett.

The thirty-sixth senatorial district shall also consist of all of the town of New Shoreham.
